%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 12:49:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

Kinda OT:

As Citibank continues to keep my account frozen, I've missed out on several
good buys. RHI. SUIT. TGX. EGP. Adding to CHB. Now I'm hurtin to buy MO and
JDEC, but can't. So when it was just one or two stocks I wasn't so upset. But
now I'm getting to where I need two hands to count the trades that can't
happen. And word is it will be next week before I can access the account. We'll
see where MWY is then, and where the prices of the above stocks sit. Problem
is, all except CHB have gone up significantly. The jury's out. It may be a
blessing still, but just a warning to anyone else contemplating transferring
accounts. The problem? Citibank says that since I'm closing the account,
they're going to keep the assets frozen. But if I were to keep the account
open, then they'd let me trade. Yeah right, good riddance. Etrade is absolved.
They've turned out to be very helpful.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 1:42:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

Distorted Return on Equity: Has anybody ever seen
a writeup of this ?

Writing down the Equity to reflect pension benefit cost is one distortion of
ROE.

The other is stock buy-back where the market is at a multiple of book value. If
you only reduced the equity account by the bookvalue, there would be no
distortion. But you have to debit with the amount paid for the stock.

Return on Equity used to be such a good measure for the quality of the
management.

Now GM has a ROE of 35 % or whatever. Means nothing, or you have to adjust it,
find out by how much in some old Annual Report 8-)

What is the meaning of Equity now ? Accountants are doing it wrong.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 1:47:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

You are all missing the distortion. See my post earlier
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 4:34:00 PM
From:James Clarke

I'm not purchasing anything at this time, but I don't think I'd have any
objection to EastGroup properties unless there's some news I missed in the last
couple months. Warehouse real estate is about as safe as you can get, and the
stock has a 9% yield. Don't buy this one if you derive the excitement in your
life from your stock portfolio. Its like watching paint dry.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 4:47:00 PM
From:James Clarke

The market currently trades at a higher ratio to book value than it ever did.
And everybody just comes up with reason after reason why book value is
irrelevant. Look at any stock that used to trade way above book value, crashed
and now THE VERY SAME ANAYLSTS come back to you and say "Look at Agco - .4
times book value" "Look at Harnischfeger - .6 times book value". Book value
often becomes more relevant than you could possibly imagine when times were
good.

Most of the stocks listed today will trade in the vicinity of their book value
at some point in the next downturn. Think of book value as your downside risk
(even though there's nothing stopping a stock from going below that) for the
average business. (Not Microsoft, but take something like Merrill Lynch - $91.)
I see no reason to believe that Merrill won't bottom at or around book value
(which is about $27 - actually it almost got there last year). Or take a decent
auto parts business like Dana (DCN). Sure, its "way down" at $37 a share, but
in a recession it goes to book value ($18).

Irrelevant?

Yeah, I'm bearish. Sleep well.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 4:59:00 PM
From:TAPDOG

Anyone follow FRD. It's trading for about book value. It's small cap and I'm
wondering if it's down because of some recent news or because small cap funds
seem to be bailing.
Fabricating steel in the oil patch may not be the trendiest business this year,
but they still make money and the dividend is over 5%.
Any opinions?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 5:48:00 PM
From:Allen Furlan

Paul, this is not really a value subject but do you still have IDTC. After
seeing the action on the zd ipo, I am tempted to speculate on some additional
shares. Whats your take on this stock?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 6:54:00 PM
From:Freedom Fighter

James,

>>The market currently trades at a higher ratio to book value than it ever did.
And everybody just comes up with reason after reason why book value is
irrelevant.<<

I don't think it's irrelevant at all. I especially agree with you about
financials like Merrill Lynch etc... I do think that for some companies that
possess a lot of intangible R&D (like software companies), the book value
understates the asset values. But in general I think P/BV is flashing the same
warning signs as almost every other standard of value.

Wayne
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 7:32:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

JJC, on Book Value, I was addressing only the distortion effect. Not whether or
not market to book is too high.

I used to look at 10 years of ROE in Value Line (one glance) and if they were
around 20 % without a hick-up, it had to be a good management. That was my
first screen . Under 1 second.

Now we have these Ego-driven, dishonest maniacs and the Auditors let them get
away with two things:

1 - They write down Pension Benefits or anything that went wrong
(“restructure”), against equity. Value Line doesn't even count “one-time”
charges in income, even if they occur ever two years. All of a sudden the
Stockholders' Equity is down.

The charge should be amortized or it should in some way be made visible,
recognized that the management goofed.

2 - They buy their own stock back, on the market. Say, spend $ 100 Million and
the book value is $ 25 Mill. Of course, the 25 Mill should be deducted from
equity. But what do they do with the 75 Mill ? Also deduct it from equity.

As a result, the denominator in ROE becomes smaller, sometimes substantially
so, and the % earned looks better. The CEO is a hero.

Why, when they buy another company by buying up all it's stock, they would have
an intangible asset, called Goodwill, and have to amortize it over 15 or more
years. Even GAAP says so. I don't see why that should not apply to one's own
stock.

The amortization of “Goodwill” = I paid too much (may be OK for a strategic
reason) is reflected in those years' Income Statements.

That would be the Honest Way and would give us an informed picture.

So, now, if I see something attractive, say General Motors with 35 % ROE, you
have to go back and look by how much the denominator was screwed. After
adjustment, the ROE usually is very pedestrian.

Its funny how often you see Stockholders Equity down, even when there were more
profits than there were Dividends. It has become a meaningless vessel, that pot
we own, in may instances.

This distortion is, of course, a partial explanation for the high Market to
Book ratios that we often see now.

Do you ever look at that ? And is there a better way to remove the distortion,
than having to go back and adding up all those “One-time” charges and
“goodwill” write-offs?

Walter in HK
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 7:50:00 PM
From:James Clarke

Now that's interesting! I'd never thought of that before. If you buy somebody
else's stock above book value, you have to take on goodwill, but if you buy
your own you don't. I am no big fan of goodwill accounting, but for
consistency's sake, you're probably right.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 9:07:00 PM
From:Shane M

Mike,

>>>>Adding to CHB.<<<<

If you're looking to add holdings in the homebuilding sector, you might
consider Toll Brothers TOL. Like CHB, their financials look Buffett-like.

I'm currently in CHB and left room to average down if need be, but am thinking
TOL might provide better diversification without sacrificing much upside.

Shane
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 9:09:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

Yeah, Double Entry Bookkeeping gets you onto

these things. I am an EE that learned Double Entry Bookkeeping in 6 hours plus
homework. For the life of me I don't understand why more people can't do a
month's worth of posting for a Cigar Store.

Also, they don't know how important the design of the Chart of Accounts can be
to see what goes on in your business. It can be a real help (provided you have
understood and defined your business) but most CEOs just eat what the
Accountants serve, just because then the Auditors ask fewer questions.

I had to convince PriceWaterhouse at the beginning. My Chart of Accounts was
"unconventional" but, they had to admit, did not contradict GAAP nor IRS rules.
It made the business transparent which was enormouly helpful.

That's what we need: Transparent reporting.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 9:10:00 PM
From:Paul Senior

Bill: re IDTC. Could you give us an updated opinion here on the value thread
for IDTC, now that it has moved up a bit? I've sold 1/6 of my position, holding
remaining. I defer to your knowledge of this company and the outlook for its
products. (note: this msg. is in response to post #6506).

-g- Bill, if I were you in responding, I'd be VERY careful about reporting
stated book value. We're in a BV discussion now, and I wrongly used Yahoo BV
figures for IDTC in my Feb. posts. And this error was easily and quickly
ascertained by some of the people who actually do some DD before they buy their
stocks. I was, and am, chagrined. But on the other hand, the stock was a value
stock possibility nevertheless-- IMO of course.

ps: Have you read, and do you recommend, Howard Jonas' book "On a Roll: from
Hot Dog Rolls to Hi-Tech Billions" for IDTC investors to get a better
perspective on the company? (I'm thinking about ordering it.)

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 9:36:00 PM
From:Mike 2.0

All, I saw cover story in today's USA Today (you know, that paper that hotel
guests step over in the morning :-) -- the headline is:

HAVE YOU MISSED THE MARKET BOOM? MILLIONS LOSING BILLIONS AS MONEY LANGUISHES
IN BANKS.

Now at first I figured they'd make the valid point that bank passbook/money mkt
rates still are unacceptably behind money mkt mutual funds...nope. The article
says a person they were profiling who had some $ in bank savings @ 1-3%
interest "easily could have made twice as much on that money. If he had
invested it in a S&P500 stock index mutual fund..."

Amazing. So now the S&P is the place for the rent money huh? Bank savings? Aw
that's for chumps. In fairness to USA Today author she finally later suggests
switching from bank savings to money mkt mutuals. Fine. But to compare a
passbook savings account to stocks for your "seed corn" money is IMO an
unconscionable comparison and the shape of things to come...down.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 9:38:00 PM
From:Daniel Chisholm

Hi Walter,

Could you please elaborate on what you mean by "Chart of Accounts"? Sounds
interesting.

- Daniel
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 10:55:00 PM
From:James Clarke

If you're looking for a Buffett play in homebuilding, also take a look at a
small homebuilder from Indiana called Crossman Communities (CROS). Its better
than it looks at first glance. Management is the kind of people you would want
to live next door to, and their track record is unbelievable. Just like Toll,
they know land value and they stick to their niche. I think you want to look
for low to mid teens for this one, but do your homework early. I've always been
wary of Toll, although it is a fine company. At the high end, this is stock
market money buying their houses. Crossman is at the low end, so you don't have
that concern. You'd think the low end would be more competitive, but not for
Crossman.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 10:58:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

Chart of Accounts - 1 min lecture

You have Assets , Liabilities and Stockholders Equity.

Double Entry Bookkeeping means you have to post everything in two accounts, one
as a "Debit", one as a "Credit"

Assets are positive when the balance is a Debit.
Liabilities are positive when a Credit. Same with Equity.

Assets are all the Co owns. Liabilities are what they owe others. Equity is the
difference, belongs to the shareholders. Therefore, Assets = Liabilities +
Equity ......the Balance Sheet

It all works out nicely, thanks to the Eyetalians who invented it.

When you get a bill for an Office Desk, you post

Office Furniture and Equipment Dr $ 500.00 Accounts Payable Cr 500

One is an asset, the other a liability, the Co owes others.

When you pay the bill, You Credit Cash (it goes down) and debit A/P which then
is zero again, you owe nothing, paid your debt.

When you pay Dividends, Cash goes down (a Credit) and the Stockholder's Equity
goes down (a Debit)

You can see, there is always a Dr and a Cr entry. Each account has two Columns.
By convention, Debit is the left side, Credit is the right side. Money coming
into the bank goes into the left side, checks paid get posted to the right
side. A reduction of the asset "bank account".

So, at the end of the month, in order to check whether you have always posted a
Dr and a Cr, you add them all up. It is called the Trial Balance, lists all
accounts and it MUST come out Zero !!

The Chart of Accounts designates names and a number to each Asset, each
Liability and the various parts of Equity (Paid-in Capital, Retained Earnings
etc) Income and Expenses are the other two major categories.

It has become a convention to have Asset account numbers to start with a "1"
Liabilities with a "2" etc.

You look at your business and figure out what account designations are best
designed to give you the picture of what happens in your business.

I believe I am correct in saying, you can call it anything, divide it up any
way, as long as it follows those 5 categories.

This way you can your accounting as a tool, to tell you what goes on. Few
people do that, rely on accountants who only want to satisfy the Auditor -
unless they are told to kindly also satisfy YOU. Both can be done at the same
time. No extra cost, except figuring out a meaningful Chart of Accounts
...once.

There are tricky ones, like "Accrued Interest" Where, if you post July and have
a Bond paying Interest in November, you must post 31 days' worth of Interest
Income in July and park the other side in "Accrued Interest" (also an asset !)
until November when that gets cleaned out, against Cash.. So, that posting is
an asset swap. Just as long as you post the same amount, once as Debit, once as
Credit.

But you are reflecting correctly that you made interest income in July, even
though the money will only arrive in November.

Did that take a minute ? Now, to remember what to post as a Debit (on the left
side) and what as a Credit (in the right column) is not intuitive in the
beginning, but accountants have it in their blood.

Except the fellow, who, when he came to work in the morning, unlocked his desk,
pulled out the top left drawer, looked at something, then started to work.

This went on for 15 years and his co-workers always wondered, what was he
looking at, first thing in the morning ?

Well, eventually he died. The key to his desk was retrieved from the family.
Everybody was curious, what did he look at every morning?

They found a piece of paper in that drawer. It said :

“ Debit is window side “

Learn Double Entry Bookkeeping. I think you will understand the Financial
Statements much better. As a matter of fact, get an accounting program (dirt
cheap) and follow your investments , rigorously. I started that when I set up a
fund for 5 kids' education. I had promised them 4 years each. Now I got my
investments in an S-Corporation (which pays no taxes, but I have to)

Walter in HK
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 11:09:00 PM
From:TwoBear

Just to add to your comments. I talked to my wife's former roommate today. She
asks me if I'm in the market and then continues to tell me that she is day
trading through DLJ. "Yea, it's fun. Buy some internet stocks in the morning,
watch it go up 20 points, and then sell in the afternoon." Then she states that
DLJ is great because they give you 15K credit as soon as you sign up without
sending any money . Man, is this getting crazy are what? I'm listening to this
with chills running up my arms and she is making money hand over fist and I
guarantee you that she couldn't tell you what p/e stood for, meanwhile my
holdings remain stagnant.

2
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 11:15:00 PM
From:Shane M

Jim,

Thanks for mentioning CROS. I'm familiar with the name, but apparently it was
from quite a while ago because I don't remember much else about the company.
Was wondering if you had an an opinion on/were familiar with another
homebuilder D.R. Horton (DHI)?

Shane
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 11:44:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

Don't worry, we will come out in the end.
Besides, she either did not tell the truth or soon will be out of money.

Out of the blue: Looked through Value Line, Edition 3. It looks as though one
can buy Oil for a little over $ 1 / barrel

Ranger Oil RGO have about 3 barrels per share and a share is $ 4.

But it is Heavy Oil and they don't make money. Still tempting. Unfortunately
only 13D filings at the SEC. I thought Canadian companies trading at the NYSE
had to file all ? Or is my EDGAR not working ?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:3/31/1999 11:45:00 PM
From:Paul Senior

FWIW, moving to a full position with CTZ (Chicago Title), a stock that works
for me on many levels:

Value: pe under 8, no debt, maybe 4x cash flow

Dividend: 3.7%

Spin-off: from Allegeny

Margin of safety: 5% stock repurchase recently announced

Business power: Chicago Title writes one of every five title insurance policies
in the US. They are consolidating (that's IMO) by buying small shops to expand
their presence/capabilities.

Negatives: not a lot of history available (to me); stock may continue to fall
as Allegany shareholders dump; p/bv is 1.75. It may be widely assumed, but not
proven (to me), that if housing market declines or interest rates rise, CTZ
will suffer, and its stock also.

Other info: FAF - a competitor, was Marty Whitman's #1 holding in 1/98. Joe
Cornell, president of Spin-Off Advisors, said (3/4/99) of CTZ, "I keep
scratching my head. This is a no-brainer".
(aside: Paul Senior says though -g-, there ain't no no-brainer stocks, and if
there are, then them are the most difficult kind to make money with. -gg-)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 1:01:00 AM
From:Walter in HK

CTZ Paul I think a good one - Thanks for post.

One can not tell from the 10K what type of securities the subs hold, this is
just one Consol Bal Sheet. Did you find anything anywhere ?

The CEO is a former Bus School Dean, may be good but "no assurance". Often
spin-offs do well, out from under the stifling parent.

Interest rate swaps - I don't know why they do that. The banks make the money
and they can get burned.

Basically a Bond fund with 15 % discount, unrealized gains 80 M ?

Do you know why they went down a few weeks ago ?

Wish I had seen it earlier. Will check your posts

Walter in HK
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 1:09:00 AM
From:Alex Greenland

Re: FRD

Have been in this one for over a year and have averaged down from ~6. The one
thing I have liked is the way the management has been able to remain profitable
with all the cheap steel that has been floating around.

Re: Chicago Title

Check out LFG as well, they are a competitor and have been selling off as well.
Book value ~40 and selling at 29.

IMHO
Alex G.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 2:39:00 AM
From:Paul Senior

Walter in HK: re CTZ. I know of no reason for the abrupt price drop recently.
What's worrisome is that stock has come back up-- but LFG (as pointed out by
Alex Greenland) is also dropping to levels (e.g. p/bv) that are much below CTZ
now; and that LFG with a longer public history shows erratic earnings and imo
almost always a low p/bv and pe- especially pe. Long term though, I think the
business is viable and CTZ "should" sell at a higher multiple of very
moderately increasing earnings or maybe on an increasing dividend. Perhaps the
business is a bond fund in disguise -- what type of bonds or detail components
of the float, I do not know. Regards, Paul
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 2:39:00 AM
From:Bill Zeman

Paul and Thread

IDTC may not be a traditional "value stock" right now, but it is a stock that
seems almost sure to appreciate significantly in the near term. And after all,
making money is what we are about more than just sticking to a certain
strategy, right?

Update: Since I last posted, IDTC drifted back into the 12's where it probably
really was a value play. After that, they announced a deal with Netscape where
their leading internet telephony product would be packaged in the tool bar of
the next release of the updated Communicator. Since Netscape provides the
browser for half the internet users, (50 million browsers), needless to say
investors saw this as bullish and pumped the stock up to 20 in 2 days. Since
then it has been trading between 16 and 18 waiting for news on the promised
IPO/spin off I wrote to you about previously.

It rallied today on a CBS Marketwatch news piece on IDT's efforts to buy back
their bonds and thereby clear the way for a (still exact details unknown) spin
off of the internet division. This almost sure soon to come IPO/spin off is
what makes this stock almost a sure lock to about double in the next few
months. Here is why:

1. The spin off will stop the internet drain on earnings and be immediately
accretive to the eps of .08 - .10 a share of the core booming telco business.

2. The new Net2Phone company will now finally be recognized and valued as a
premier internet stock. Since the CEO Howard JOnas owns 1/3 of the shares
outstanding, (12 million), I have got to believe that the terms of the IPO/spin
off are going to be very favorable to share holders of IDTC common stock. Check
this quote and link out:

Freidman, Billings, Ramsey and Co forecasts revenues of $45m for Net2Phone in
1999, potentially giving the company a market capitalization to the tune of
$450 million.

"Even by conservative estimates, we are looking in the region of at least $300m
market capitalization," said Riyad Said, an Analyst at Freidman, Billings,
Ramsey and Co.

http://www.ilocus.com/news16.htm

IDT's current market capitalization is only 400 million or so. This IPO spin
off will potentially double the business value overnight!! These valuations
could go MUCH higher. Remember EBAY. They control 89% a projected 3.8 billion
dollar market by the year 2001, and their stock does a ten bagger in less than
a year. IDT must control close to 90% of the IP telephony market that is at
least going to be as big by 2001. What will Net2Phone do?

The internet upside potential of this stock is not yet priced in because the
telco part of the business is 10 times the size of the internet business, and
there is still uncertainty of the details of the IPO/spin off. Have any of you
guys kicked yourselves for not being in the internet stocks a year ago on the
ground floor? IDTC is providing another opportunity. I sat and watched YAHOO
and ELNK and others rally day after day from the sidelines. I'm not sitting and
watching this one.

Bill Zeman
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 8:02:00 AM
From:Daniel Chisholm

Thanks so much for the 1 min lecture. I find double entry bookkeeping to be
oftentimes counterintuitive, perhaps because I never learned it. I have sort of
figured out enough about accounting (reading balance sheets, trying to match
cash to accrual incomes, etc) to keep up with fundamental analyses (and
sometimes even fake it myself), but the idea of a debit to assets resulting in
an increase in assets still seems backwards to me ;-) And "income tax asset
bad, income tax liability good" took some getting used to as well.

I have the suspicion that learning bookkeeping will be like learning quantum
mechanics. The first time you hear about it it seems all weird wonderful and
counterintuitive, but you figure that once you learn how it works it will all
make sense. After a while it no longer seems weird and you know what happens
and how to work with it, but it's not because it makes any more "sense" than it
originally did, rather, one accepts it after a while and it becomes part of
your intuition.

- Daniel

P.S. I've always wanted someone to write a series of books for cross-training
educated intelligent people. It seems that books are either written as
introductions for novices starting from scratch, or for experts already fluent
in the field. Neither really help me when I want to get up to speed on
something I never studied. I'd buy any or all titles such as these:

A Statistics Primer for University Graduates - No prior statistics knowledge
needed, assumes strong grasp of math and calculus

Structural Engineering for Math or Physics Grads - You know the tools, here's
the application

Financial Analysis for University Graduates - Or, all a scientist needs to
become an equity analyst

Accounting for non-Business Graduates - How to understand accountants, and
speak to them without embarrassing yourself

English Grammar for Programmers, Scientists and Engineers - "Whom" isn't just
snotty, it's also precise and de-ambiguifying!

Any more?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 11:24:00 AM
From:Bob Rudd

Dan: Closed my position in Loewen yesterday...with a modest profit due more to
buying a dip and selling a rally than finding an incredible value. Despite
their success in cutting a deal with bankers announced yesterday, and the
possibility they will continue to do so, I can't ignore the fact that 4
bankruptcy prediction models show that as the probable result. Besides,
following it all takes too much time for a modest position. Good luck on your
bond play if you decide to do it.
Bob
Accounting: I beleive there's a shareware accounting tutorial available on
zdnet and similar sites http://www.hotfiles.com/index.html
search for accounting tutorial
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 7:24:00 PM
From:TimbaBear

Title Insurance revenues are highly dependent on mortgage
transactions....everything will look rosy right now because of the refinance
boom that has been going on for the last year or so has vastly increased
(probably doubled) the number of mortgage transactions....if interest rates
rise, their volume will drop appreciably and they will have excess overhead
until they re-adjust....I haven't followed this or any title company (and don't
intend to) but you might want to check and see if the moves in price were at
the same time that rates took a jump due to inflation fears highlighted by the
OPEC news and the resultant rise in oil prices....then decide for yourself what
you think rates are going to do in the foreseeable future and what effect that
will have on revenue stream.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 8:04:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

An asset play about to bear fruit?

I have a full position in Loews, avg price $92. Now it's $73. I just told my
fiancee that I was going to increase the position by 1/2 in am (if I can trade)
in lieu of buying MO. Then I see this.

http://biz.yahoo.com/rf/990401/bdw.html

My calculation of asset value pegs it at more than 2X current share price. The
valuation is on my website under the portfolio section.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 8:22:00 PM
From:Terry Maynard

Walter, I am curious about your use of an S Corp. I am in the same boat with 4
children; however, have most of the investments in an IRA.
I appreciate your wisdom and time.

Thank you.

Terry
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 8:33:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

Daniel,..learning bookkeeping will be like learning quantum mechanics ?
No, it is much easier. All you need by way of prior education, is adding,
subtracting and percentage calculation !! I am an EE, you don't need Fourier
Analysis and LaPlace transforms !! I learned it in 6 hours plus homework. The
rest is learned by applying. Practising it by actually doing - your own books,
somebody else's books for a month - and checking out Financial Statements, with
a pencil and calculator.

Once you learned it, you can think through why it works the way it does.
Thereafter it will no longer appear counterintuitive, once you realize : The
names Credit and Debit are a convention. Don't read meaning into it.

Regarding your books, to have correct English Grammar is always good. It will
be respected by those who learned it correctly. I should know, English is my
second language.

The rest of the books you mentioned, I would forget, at least for stock review.

Statistics: Only helpful in esoteric applications. Most things in life are very
simple. The key is to be able to recognize the essence of complicated
circumstances. Then they are simple.

To that end, what I found most useful were the books of Peter Drucker. He helps
you get down to the essence. That is important whether you work as an employe,
a manager and certainly, when you run your own business. Before Drucker, there
was no business literature and just about all else is still poor imitation.
Some Loudmouths that push fads. He is still alive, but getting very old. Just
bought “On the Profession of Management”1998, for my wife, but only leafed
through it, before buying.

Drucker you can trust to help you. The rest are Fad people. Including the
Harvard Business School. I once asked a famous HBS Emeritus professor, about 10
years ago, when we all stood in awe of the Japanese and American Manufacturing
was low life:

“Why should one not blame the Business Schools for that ?” I will never forget
his wonderfully academically phrased answer: “ There were companies with good
ideas (meaning the likes of General Electric which has been outstanding even
before Jack Welch) and we systematized it to great disadvantage”

In plain language, the great Harvard Business School taught fads. Imitating
fads never works anyway. You have to arrive at whatever you do by thinking it
through yourself. And for that, I found Peter Drucker helpful. Why, I thought
of "Empowering" 40 years ago because I saw: Most people want to do a good job.
Checking all the time demotivates. Demotivation costs more than the mistakes.
You learn more.People have more fun. Now it's the latest fad.

I hope you and others find these remarks helpful. I have a BS detector which
rings alarms when encountering BS. I got there from reading Drucker. You have
to do your own thinking, stockmarket, job, family, budget planning.

I indulge in this philosophical excursion only because I think some of it is
germane to Value Investing: Recognize the Essence of the business you invest
in. Be able to analyse by understanding how accounting works. If you want to go
further: Taxes.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 9:11:00 PM
From:Bob Rudd

Great post, Walter. Especially liked <<Most things in life are very simple. The
key is to be able to recognize the essence of complicated circumstances. Then
they are simple.>>
There is, however one Harvard type most investors would do well to read:
Michael Porter. His stuff on competition is outstanding and aside from
management incompetence, competition is a major limiting factor on
profitability. Porter's "Competitive Strategy" and recent essay "What is
Strategy" provide superior insights into this area.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 10:25:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

Terry ..use of an S-Corporation
It will not save you taxes, generally. You have to figure out whether it has
appeal to you.

Here are the characteristics and why I formed an S-Corp. But first, what I did
for my kids' education.

I am a believer in profit center thinking, separate purposes and relate the
financial part to them.

So, I set up a Trust, after I sat down one day and figured out in which years
how much money is needed for 4 years each for 5 children. They are 6 years
apart (twins) and therefore 20 years of college spread over 10 calendar years
(6 + 4). I figured out when I would be broke. This spurred me on. At least I
thought about it early, one does know 18 years (plus 8 months) in advance !!!

So, I set up a Trust, put in money every year, invested, read Value Line Sunday
morning for two hours. My father-in-law was the Trustee.The Donor can not be
the Trustee. The kids had to plan each Semester, have a budget and an
accounting for the previous semester (which agreed with the bank statements)
Done on a spreadsheet which were soon available, thank goodness.

Then the Trustee would be instructed to write checks for those semesters. He
was a wonderful Trustee. All they had to supply was the accounting for the
previous semester, the total budget (down to tickets to come for Xmas, books -
total)

As a result I can tell you what each 1st degree did cost, down to the last
cent. I saved $ 100 000 and paid out $ 325 000, at the end there was money left
over. It went to the Stanford Med School degree of the last child, there being
no other purpose. Paid about half of that. Then the Trust was dissolved. Never
had to change my standard of living, even though one year four were in college
at the same time, three at MIT.

The key was to save early and invest. Taxes are lower in the US but college is
not free. In Canada and Germany taxes are skyhigh but college was free, in
Germany no time limit! So, all I did I applied the tax saving and didn't take
it to go to Acapulco as most people with my income did. After which they
complain about the hgh cost of tertiary education.

S-Corporation is a form of corporation which you have to elect when you
organize a new corporation. It can not have more than 70 stockholders (used to
be 35), generally can only have one kind of stock and not be owned by a
C-Corporation, the normal type.

The S-Corp pays no taxes, but it has to give each shareholder a K-1 Form which
lists how much and what type of income was made, pro-rata, by that shareholder.

The K-1 income must then be reported on your Form 1040 Income Tax return. Just
like you would report 1099's etc. The computer tax programs - I use MacInTax -
will ask you about your K-1s in the Interview. Pretty easy at that point.

You have a corporate bank account, a corporate seal (which you need on your
stock certificates when transferring stock to someone or to the broker for
sale), you get a corporate ID number, just like on the 1099 payor number. You
have a Board (yourself + ?) and a Corporate Secretary (yourself) You have to
file a 1120S corporate tax return, which is work, as is the accounting you have
to do, but not all that much. There used to be a MacInTax for business which
included S-corporations, but they discontinued it (The Intuit CEO is on te
Apple Board !) so, now I use TurboTax for Business and run it on VirtualPC
2.1.1

Doing taxes with these programs is almost fun, I hate to admit.

Very important, of course, you can divide your S-Corp up any way you like by
issuing or transferring stock. (Board decision, minutes) The ownership is
represented by the Stock Certificate. I guess, if you gave some stock to your
children, and their K-1 income is low, they don't have to file at all. When it
grows, they are in a lower tax brackets.

So, I guess, it could help save taxes. Of course, if most of the increase in
value is gain, and unrealized, there is no tax at all, until you sell. No 1040
for the kids.

Now, I set up an S-Corporation for a totally different reason: I was retiring
and was going to sell the house in a New York City Suburb which I had bought 28
years earlier. Huge, huge Capital Gain, unless you buy a new residence within +
or - two years of the sale of the old one. The IRS law at the time (it has
changed a lot)

But prices were going up in Florida and I wanted to buy a house three years
before retirement. What to do ? I paid $ 300 for the following advice: I can
set up an S-Corporation, have it buy the house and rent it. When I have sold
the old house, I kick the renter out and buy the new house from the
S-Corporation, with the proceeds from the sale of the old house, which I pay
into the S-Corp.

The advice was, it is not harmful to buy from a related party. So, I did. That
is why the S-Corp has all that house money and invests in stock.

It was extremely fortunate that I did this, because a month before my
retirement, my wife was diagnosed with cancer. The house was sold, subject to
inspection. The inspector was one day late. I could keep the house, took care
of my wife for a year until she died.

I sure would have missed the two year window. I learned thinking in tax terms
when I ran the holding company. It is amazing what you can do, legitimately.

The S-Corp BTW made passive losses (renting usually does, the money is in
appreciation, if any), but when you give up renting you can offset earned
income with it. So, I did save taxes there also. When I sold it to myself, I
did so at a price substantiated by a Real Estate Appraisal - in case the IRS
audits.

You mention IRA. There are now Education IRA's possible. I have not studied
them, no more need. (I let my kids study it for Grandkids) It may be covered by
the IRS Publication 590 (so is Roth). If so, I recommend writing for it -
reading seriously on the screen is a pain - or print that section.

http://www.irs.ustreas.gov/prod/forms_pubs/index.html

There is, of course an IRS Publication for S-Corps but I can't lay my hand on
the number. I always study these first, then stuff from brokers, newspaper
articles on the subject, etc.

If you have questions, will be glad to answer

Walter
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 10:46:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

Bob ... Michael Porter .. It doesn't hurt to read it
and I haven't. Actually, I did start and gave up. Too long ago. I have a
daughter who graduated there.

Did you read it, and what did you, actually, get out of it ?

I think the most important thing of graduating from HBS is the connections. A
Harvard professor once said, Harvard is very good in the admissions process.
What they mainly do, is, expose them to each other, and afterwards they take
credit for their accomplishments.

That was actually better than my read: I asked my daughter, how many in your
class ? 750. How many did not graduate ? 12

Hah ! I thought, they are good in picking the most competitive types. The thing
to do is, to be admitted to the HBS, then not attend, but mention in your
resume that you were admitted.

But it was also pointed out to me that the fund raising would stop.

So, I think the professor's explanation is a better one. They don't learn all
that much there, imho. It's the stuff they are made of, to begin with, and the
connections.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/1/1999 10:52:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

CTZ Function of # of mortgage transactions ..
Very intelligent post. Yeah. One has to understand CTZ better. It is more than
a bond fund at a discount 8-)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 12:55:00 AM
From:Paul Senior

Walter in HK: re: Value Line on Sundays. I used to do the same thing. Except I
couldn't find the stocks you found, or if I did, I couldn't hold on to them
--g--. Very interesting to me to observe old days-- walk in library get VL, no
problem. Nowadays (and it doesn't make any diff. which library I go to): have
to wait when I can find the book at all. And when I start to read... pages torn
and missing. That's when I knew we were back to the '60's bull market. Now I'm
even seeing people standing around the VL book, pointing to pages and
discussing.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 1:10:00 AM
From:Bob Rudd

Walter, referring to Porter <<Did you read it, and what did you, actually, get
out of it?>> Yes, Competitive Strategy, "What is Strategy" essay and several
other pieces. What I got out of them was an organized way to look for and at
competitive issues facing an enterprise. Competitive pressures not merely from
similar rival firms as is traditionally viewed, but from suppliers, customers,
substitute products. How information can change competitive dynamics. On and
on.
Everybody crunches numbers to analyze companies [Well they used to anyway] but
Porter's ideas are helpful in understanding the difference between a company
that may have a sustainable advantage and one that is enjoying a brief spot of
luck in an otherwise rat eat rat competitive existence that will ultimately
kill profitability.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 1:12:00 AM
From:Paul Senior

The ruling reason for CTZ is that they do, and will do, 1 of every five title
insurance policies. That makes them a sustainable business. They are buying
small shops for cash, and buying back their own stock. This is now in the good
times. When the bad times come, they will- or could - expand their business
reach even further. (They have little debt.) This then makes them viable, to my
mind. Especially if the real estate market downturns come, as has happened in
the past, at staggered times (Norteast vs. West vs. Southwest, etc.) Not to say
stock won't drop and drop a bunch. But this company offers a lot (-pun!-g-) to
a value investor. That's of course, all just IMHO.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 1:18:00 AM
From:Walter in HK

Paul, Value Line on Sundays - (and CTZ)
I was lucky enough, could justify that the company pays for it - had to follow
what competitors did when I was in the Holding Company. Now, I take the bite
and pay. I.e. have the S-Corp pay, automatically reduces taxes. Get it Mo or
Tue here. I save one issue a year, many years back, so I can see what happened
earlier.

Can't do that on CTZ, there was not too much in Alleghany, they don't even have
a website. Zip in Yahoo! Search. This Alleghany guy Kirby still own a third of
CTZ

What did you think of the comment that CTZ income is highly influenced by
mortgage transactions ?

Do you go over the "Expanded Edition" ? Sometimes interesting.

You must be on the Westcoast, judging by the Time.
We got Good Friday 2 pm
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 1:41:00 AM
From:Paul Senior

Wallace Rivers: Giving up some OLS. I'm selling 1/3 to offset capital gains on
other stocks. Doesn't look like I'll ever turn a profit on this investment. But
that's not the point. The point is that from here (6), the stock does have a
potential to recover to 9, maybe 12, maybe who knows where. They are trying to
resolve the business issues that face them in health care, and trying to put
the gov't problem behind them. But they settled their "fradulent behavior"
(quotes mine) for $61 million? That was some problem. There goes their
credibility for me.

Still holding LDRY and tracking it against STAR (which I do not own). LDRY
down; STAR up (by a bunch).

Never did buy WLM. Own PET (as in polyeth. terephthalate) producer EMN though.
For someone who might be interested in betting on the future of plastic litre
bottles, the WLM stock price looks to me to be near a cyclical low. (But who
knows?)

regards, Paul
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 3:06:00 AM
From:James Clarke

Wow. That's big. Loews has always been a breakup value story. The danger in a
breakup value story is that the value never gets "breaked up". Looks like Larry
Tisch is making the right move again. Sell CNA to Berkshire, sell tobacco to
MO.

The risk to this scenario is that selling CNA could represent a fraudulent
conveyance. The same reason RN couldn't just spin off Nabisco.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 4:33:00 AM
From:James Clarke

[reposted from Buffetology thread] Journal Register (JRC)

[Unlike most of my stock recommendations, this one does not contain a
valuation. I've done one, and if anybody is interested we can get into it. The
stock is cheap. But I have taken this one from Buffett's perspective. First,
what kind of business do I want to own? Then buy it at the right price. JRC is
the kind of business I want to own. And I think it is the right price, though I
have no doubt it could go lower in a market panic.

And to deflect an obvious cheap shot, where do I get off posting a buy
recommendation two weeks after saying I sold half of my portfolio? Good
question. As many of you know, my job is with an investment fund. So my sell
was half of my personal portfolio, and I stand by that. But my job is to look
for ideas every day - professionally I HAVE to be 100% invested in stocks.
Personally I have the option of going into cash. This is one I recently bought
professionally. If a first time poster played this game, I would be the first
to trash him or her for that inconsistency, but I think I've earned a little
bit of credibility on this thread over the last couple years. What I am saying
here is that if I wanted to invest in this market, this is the kind of thing I
would buy. If that logic is too strained, then I should probably keep ideas to
myself for a while. I just don't know how something like that reads to you - I
recognize the conflict.]

While we're all dreaming about Coke, let's consider another of Warren Buffett's
favorite businesses. Newspapers. Go back and read what Buffett has written
about the business of newspapers, and consider the compounding he has achieved
with one brilliant purchase of Washington Post. The economics of this industry
are almost unparalleled. The logic is that a half decent newspaper is a natural
monopoly.

Newspaper stocks are out of favor now. (Put that in perspective. In this market
the phrase "out of favor stock" may be the world's biggest oxymoron).

I would point you toward a little company in Trenton, NJ called Journal
Register (JRC). They are exclusively in the newspaper business. No television
stations. And they are in the LOCAL newspaper business. Community newspapers.
When I think about where the monopolies are in the newspaper business, I think
local.

Think about your local newspaper. It is likely to be a monopoly from two
angles. 1) Where else can you get information on your kid's little league team,
or your kid's elementery school? If you are part of the community you probably
subscribe - what's it cost you? $40 a year? 2) The economics of newspapers is
advertising (which is closely tied to the economics of subscriptions). The New
York Times competes with television and national magazines. Who does your local
newspaper compete with? If I'm the local pizza shop or the local realtor, I
have to advertise in the local paper. If they raise the price 5% I still have
to advertise in the local paper. If I want to sell my car, I advertise in the
local newspaper. These two dynamics combine to equal pricing power which few
businesses have.

Newspapers, especially local newspapers, have a couple other characteristics
which are very favorable to the investor. There is very little capital
expenditure required - cash flow is free cash flow to the shareholder. The
product cycle is as long as product cycles get. Has the business changed in the
last century? Not much. Will the internet change it? Maybe if a local newspaper
is completely blindsided by the internet, but Journal Register is positioned to
just transfer its franchise to the internet if that's what the customer wants.
And when I look at a business that has the same economics as it did 100 years
ago, before television or radio, my hunch is that the internet is not going to
change things much either.

Journal Register is a consolidator of local newspapers. They own a bunch of
them, concentrated in five regions. In these markets, when they buy a
neighboring paper, think of the economics. Fire half the staff - you can do a
lot of the advertising sales on a regional basis. Your best state government
reporter can run the same story in all your regional papers - if they were run
separately they would each need a state government reporter. You can even print
the newspaper at another press you own and close down the acquired paper's
print shop. You can sell advertising as a regional package. The management of
JRC understands this and exploiting these local economies of scale is their
mission in life. The only criticism I can make of this management team is that
they are too "gung ho" in cutting costs.

JRC trades at about $12 a share. I think it is worth about 20 and that value is
growing. What you will see first if you give it a look is oodles of debt and
negative book value. But don't pass without first looking at the free cash flow
the business generates, and the steadiness of that free cash flow. Leverage,
within reason, is not a great concern for this type of business. But the
leverage of the business makes it very difficult to say whether it is worth 15
or 20 or 30 a share. I am satisfied that it is worth significantly more than
the stock price, and that that value will grow over time.

I have no problem with buying JRC for the long term at the current price. If
the market breaks hard, this stock is illiquid and may drop to truly idiotic
prices, so it is worth getting to know now so you can scoop it up at 8 in a
panic.

If we're going to look for Buffett investments today, remember we're not
Buffett. We don't have his mind - but if we truly understand what he has tried
to teach us, we can learn from his wisdom. But we also don't have his size.
While I'd love to be worth $40 billion, that is not an advantage as an
investors. I don't have to invest a billion dollars in every idea to make it
worthwhile. Buffett freely admits that size is his biggest problem today - he
might agree with me that JRC is a steal at the current price, but it wouldn't
matter because the company is too small. What that tells me is forget Coke.
Study Buffett economics, and find those economics in a small cap stock that is
being thrown in the trash in this large cap obsessed market. That is what led
me to JRC.

%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 11:35:00 AM
From:Michael Burry

OK, so I never went to biz school, but I'll confess I've studied
finance texts and done mini-cases to get up to speed a bit. Where all of what I
studied fits in to a successful investment strategy, I don't know. It seems
trial-and-error and Graham and Buffett have been more helpful.

Looking at Journal Register (JRC) is a good example. So there's this M&M
proposition that debt/equity ratio doesn't affect firm value, and that if it
does it's mainly because of taxes, and that because of this stable growth firms
with minimal tax loss reserves should take on lots of debt to decrease their
weighted average cost of capital, constrained by the increased return required
by investors for the increased risk of bankruptcy. That's way way
oversimplified to the point of having some errors, I know. Still it tells maybe
that JRC maybe is doing the right thing with all its debt though.

So JRC has all this debt, all these acquisitions, a big A&D expense, free cash
flow of $66M up steadily from $53M 2 years ago, with annual interest payments
(tax-deductible of course) of $45M last year, down from a little over $50M a
few years ago. To me, the cash flow doesn't offset the interest expense enough
to catch my eye, especially given the market cap, but I do see that the trend
is favorable. And I see that I'm not worried about them going bankrupt.

I'm not sure what to make of it. I liked Tricon Global at $26 despite negative
equity and it has done very well. But then I knew that Pepsi had purposely
loaded Tricon with debt precisely because the cash flow was so high. The
perception of newspapers is in the dumps, too, as restaurant stocks have been.
But Tricon was one of the top 10 performers in the S&P 500 last year. So
isolated success stories do happen within depressed industries and debt/equity
or -(equity) isn't prohibitive of this.

And I appreciate that JRC is probably earning its weighted cost of capital. I
haven't taken the time to figure it out, but I'm assuming its WACC is pretty
low.

Interesting. It's still making new lows. I'll stand back and see how cheap it
gets. And I'm still not convinced that small-town newspapers won't lose out to
the internet, but that's not entering my decision now.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 11:52:00 AM
From:Roger L. Chuchen

Hi, I've been lurking here for almost a year now. So, I figure this may be a
good time for me to come out of my hiding place.

Mike, I have a few questions about the valuation of Loews. First, is WEB really
going to consider purchasing CNA? While most (or maybe even all) of WEB's
insurance subsidiaries make an underwriting profit, the combined ratio of CNA
for the last three years have been over 100 (with 1998 being 114+). WEB likes
to buy companies that have excellent management in place. So, I guess I'm
questioning the competency of the management. In addition, WEB is really big in
reinsurance and auto insurance. Although CNA does have a reinsurance division,
it also has other lines (such as life) that WEB has not previously entered.
Lastly, CNA makes up about 80% of LTR's revenue. If the rumor does come into
fruition, LTR is going to be left with the tobacco division generating about
75% of LTR's revenue (it's currently at 15%). Given the uncertainties
surrounding the tobacco industry at this time, isn't Wall Street going to give
an even lower valuation on Loews?

Thanks in advance! I've always everyone's posts here (especially yours and
JJC's). This thread definitely counts as one of the best threads on SI.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 2:10:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

The valuation of Loews is asset-based. They have several holdings which are
already valued by the marketplace, such CNA and Diamond Offshore, which the
market values at a current ~$6 billion. LTR now trades at $8.5 billion. I'd
assume any sale would be around Diamond's true worth of around $3.5 billion and
CNA's around $5 billion. So to me, you get the hotels, Bulova watch, Tisch
investment prowess and Lorillard for free. Lorillard is the lowest
cost-per-pack producer, and grew revenues 18% last year. It can generate half a
billion in cash flow/year. So I'd say it's worth at the very least $4 billion
(8XCF, MO is at around 14XCF). Basically, the market doesn't respect asset
plays today. So my premise is that Lorillard has a positive present value. If
one believes, as the market does currently, that Lorillard (which is the most
profitable cigarette co on a per pack basis, with the fastest-growing premium
brand) has a negative value, then LTR would not be as big a value. But it still
would have a margin of safety from here.

Loews today is denying all rumors. To me, CNA is large and a turnaround
candidate in the right hands.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 3:17:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

There is another wildcard in the Loews valuation. I called them the other day
to find out how much of the $4B Canary Wharf IPO they owned. Don't have an
answer yet.

MIke
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 3:56:00 PM
From:Bob Rudd

JRC: Reading your analysis and glancing at it JRC looked real appealing.
Digging deeper turned up some issues. Suggest you read the Yahoo board on
this....Some impressions I got:
They overpaid for a lot of these papers..perhaps way overpaid
They're running them poorly...One was voted worst newspaper in Conn.
Excess cost cutting which you alluded to..comment from Yahoo poster that
sounded like he knew his stuff [SparkyJRC 1254 of 1279]
<<2. How does JRC make so much profit? CUTTING COSTS. Bob is an accountant who
knows how to do everything possible (short of reusing toilet paper) to make
sure each paper is spending as little as possible. He also cuts staff far
deeper than he should. End result, that $1 of revenue that used to net 20 cents
in profit now nets 50 cent with JRC in charge. PROBLEM: The paper looses more
value by lost revenues and circulation than Bob saves on the other end. A prime
example of the saying "penny wise and dollar foolish".>>

Financial strength: I ran their numbers thru 2 versions of the Altman
Bankruptcy Predictor Model and JRC come up toast [Another Bankruptcy prediction
model, Springate, showed them OK but it's not as well regarded as Altman]

Jim, I know you do a lot of hands on research and the folks on Yahoo may be
biased, disgruntled ex-employees [though most didn't come across that way], but
it kinda looks, 1st cut, like the relative underperformance of this may be
deserved..The Washington Post it ain't.

I would also question the idea that the internet doesn't change the game. A
pure internet-based provider could do business with only a staff of local
reporters and ad sales reps...no costs associated with big buildings, printing
presses, carriers, dead trees. The cost of daily local newspaper is probably
closer to $240 than $40 for most folks...this would cover an online service.
It'll be awhile before this has a serious revenue impact, but it's gonna be a
big issue with investors looking at future revenue streams.

Sorry to come across negative on this, because I really wanted to like it.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 4:31:00 PM
From:Roger L. Chuchen

Thanks for the response, Mike. I really like to know how much of the $4B LTR
nets.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 4:35:00 PM
From:cfimx

bob,

With all due respect, i really have to giggle at this "bancruptcy predictor." I
guess this means there is still hope for PEOPLE.

I spent five minutes looking at jrc and determined that it is nowhere CLOSE to
going bankrupt, now or anytime in the next millineum. for one, the company has
a phenomenal pre tax roa (ex cash, and goodwill), at least two to three times
the profitability of the typical sp500 company. While it carries a big debt
load, it can easily SERIVCE that debt. If you had a HIGH, PREDICTABLE, and
rising income, you could SERVICE a lot of debt too, couldn't you? Especially if
you used your debt to increase your income, which is what jrc is doing.

The company generates an abundance of free cash flow, which is slowly RISING.
Some analysts suggest that this dynamic, combined with a leveraged balance
sheet is a good thing. Why? for one, the equity investor has a leveraged
return. The company likely will use its free cash flow to pay down debt. Each
$/share of debt the company can pay down ADDS one $/share to the implied value
of your equity stub. You don't have to worry about capital allocation.

With all due respect bob, I think it's time to chuck ALL the formulas and get
back to looking at companies like an owner/acquirer does. These guys don't PLUG
numbers into formulas.

That being said, I personally don't find the company attractive, only because I
like some things ( which happen to be small and overlooked ) better. But I
wholeheartedly agree that it is places LIKE THIS where we need to cast our
lines.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 4:52:00 PM
From:sjemmeri

How about HLR as a newspaper biz alternative to JRC?
Looks cheaper by some measures (P/S, P/CF) and pays
a 4% div. Owns Chicago Sun-Times and many other papers
in US, UK, Canada, and Israel.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 4:54:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

Over on Hvide Marine's board, the Altman bankruptcy predictor was used to
predict "near death" for HMAR. I responded that the quantitative model was neat
but that I could tell the same by the SEC forms and some common sense. I'm no
fan of models like these either.

But Bob's point about JRC is relevant I think. You have a stock of a company
that is run in Draconian fashion, and the papers generally suck. How many of
these papers really have a monopoly in their little town? From the Yahoo board,
which is a pretty emotional place, one would think that these things are
getting run into the ground. But not having been to these towns I don't know.
And with the stock making steady new lows, it's worth it to let it go, see how
far it falls.

On another note, I see that Anchor Gaming (SLOT) and IGT are falling in
response to pending legislation and decreases in casino builds. I'm preparing
to buy both. The logic behind their falls just doesn't hold. It seems to me
that IGT, even if it were forced to sell machines, could just charge huge
prices for them to reflected discounted future cash flows. They own over 70% of
the market. SLOT just looks too good to be true, although I'd like more insider
buying. I expect a pretty good bounce once the legislation is out of the way
and done with, no matter how it goes. And it is already watered down.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 4:55:00 PM
From:James Clarke

Mike, if you're going to compare cash flow to interest to determine a coverage
ratio, use the cash flow BEFORE interest payments, not free cash flow to
equity. That $50 million or so of free cash flow is after interest is paid, so
that can go to pay down debt. Their return on capital is extremely high.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 5:04:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

Duh, my bad. Worked it too fast.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 5:06:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

Like HLR on first look. Thanks for the heads up. 3X EBITDA,
manageable debt.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 5:06:00 PM
From:James Clarke

Bob, I would love to see this bankruptcy predictor formula too. I tend to be
very conservative when it comes to bankruptcy candidates - I don't go near
them. I'd be interested in why this one screens so well with me and Twister and
so bad with that formula.

You are onto something with the CEO's "pennywise and pound foolish" cost
cutting. The guy is quite a character. He may indeed reuse toilet paper. While
I have no sense that he is overpaying for acquisitions, I have no doubt the guy
pisses people off at the papers he acquires then guts. And I got the sense when
I read the Yahoo thread that its the same five ex-employees griping over and
over again. He's also got a CFO who is much more conservative and very smart. I
think she and the majority owner (Warberg Pincus) will keep the CEO from doing
anything too stupid. So far, though, I have a hard time questioning any move
he's made. But I agree with you, it is a concern to keep in mind and bring to
the attention of anybody looking at the stock.

Regarding the internet, JRC's papers have internet sites, and the company
claims their internet business is profitable. They're going into the internet,
I believe, to play defense - just in case it becomes an issue they would be the
natural one to take that market too because it is tied to the same advertisers
and the same content. The risk to a good local paper from the internet, if
there is one, is that they fall asleep at the wheel and somebody gets in in
front of them.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 5:08:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=8422798
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 5:12:00 PM
From:cfimx

let's see here. I guess any company that minimizes working capital, and has the
misfortune to have its equity value marked down by market conditions ( the bv
of the debt cannot be) is in deep doo doo. This reminds me of BETA.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 5:17:00 PM
From:James Clarke

OK, I checked out the bankruptcy formula. While I think screening with that
formula would find you an awful lot of bankruptcy candidates, if I am looking
at a business I know I am not going to use that kind of formula. The checks I
will do on something like JRC are threefold:
1) Cash flow after necessary capital expenditures vs. annual interest payment.
This not only gives me a degree of confidence that they can pay their interest
or not, but it also tells me how much they have left over to pay down debt or
grow the company.
2) Steadiness of that cash flow - purely a function of the business.
3) Is the debt fixed or floating? In JRC's case half of it is floating. If
there is anything to worry about here, that's it.
For another kind of business, a down and out cyclical for example, I might look
at other things.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 6:18:00 PM
From:TimbaBear

In the residential mortgage business, underwriters qualify borrowers who get
Adjustable Rate Mortgages (ARM)at 2% above note rate and this seems like a
good, conservative cross-check on any variable debt (or, at least, the rate the
note would have under the worst case scenario within one year from the latest
adjustment)....if you looked at JRC's ARM debt from that perspective, is there
still enough cushion in free cash flow for your comfort?.....I have not looked
at any of their numbers....I'm fully invested in other companies and situations
right now, so I'm not really looking for other opps just yet.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 6:46:00 PM
From:James Clarke

If you're asking what's their floating interest rate, its less than 2% above
LIBOR. If that's not what you're asking, I'm missing your point. Please be more
clear.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/2/1999 11:43:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

my thoughts exactly; i don't find utility in the formula at all
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 2:29:00 AM
From:James Clarke

Why is everybody looking for a shortcut?

Is it so hard to read a 10-K and if you don't understand the business move on
to something else? And if you can't handle financial documents what is wrong
with a mutual fund? If you don't understand the business or the valuation, no
formula is going to save you. A bull market may save you, temporarily. Formulas
such as low P/E, low P/B, high ROE, and this bankruptcy black box are useful to
screen all the securities out there for certain characteristics. But when it
comes down to whether or not to invest in a specific security, I don't think
there's any substitute for good old fashioned work, plus a lot of financial
skill and experience. In a bull market the likes of this one, when people are
tripling their money in internet stocks, it is easy to forget that, and many
people who should know better have forgotten it. I am talking about people who
run mutual funds.

When I buy or sell a security, I try to think of who is on the other side of
that trade. Somebody is selling it to me, thinking it is going to go down. Or
somebody is buying it from me, thinking it is going to go up. Who is that
person, what do they know that I don't know? If I don't believe I have more
information than the guy on the other side of the trade, why am I betting
against him? Its a zero sum game when you look at a single trade. On the other
hand, if (as I think is very prevalent today) the guy on the other side of the
trade is running some computer model while I have read all the financials on
the company, crunched the numbers, understand the business and maybe even sat
down for two hours with management, I can be pretty confident. And in the case
of this bankruptcy model, if I have three years experience doing leveraged
buy-out deals for a major Wall Street firm, I hope to God the guy selling the
stock to me is acting on a black box model.

Once again, there is no substitute for hard work. Ask anybody who's succeeded
at anything. This is not directed at anybody on this thread, certainly not the
guy who posted the bankruptcy model, because that may very well just be the
start of his research. It is directed at a sense I get in the market today that
many many investment professionals think they don't have to read financials or
own a calculator if they have the right "black box". It is something I fight at
my own firm.

As a final thought, I ask you, when an index fund buys or sells a stock, I
would think they would be at a disadvantage to somebody who does their
homework, because any trade an index fund makes is by definition brainless. I
can't for the life of me accept that index funds will outperform good investors
in the future because of that one simple fact. The bigger index funds get, the
more this fundamental weakness matters. I have a 25% gain in Berkshire Hathaway
in three months solely because I bought it from an index fund when they had to
sell it.

Don't call me old fashioned. I'm only 30.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 9:09:00 AM
From:Freedom Fighter

Mike,

>>On another note, I see that Anchor Gaming (SLOT) and IGT are falling in
response to pending legislation and decreases in casino builds. I'm
preparing to buy both. <<

Could you please elaborate (time permitting) on your understanding of these two
businesses and the issues related to the stocks falling? They both just made my
screen of potential values but I have never looked at either. I am interested
in getting up to speed on the story before I spend too much time looking at the
numbers.

Wayne
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 9:18:00 AM
From:TimbaBear

In post 6557 one of the things you said was.... "Is the debt fixed or floating?
In JRC's case half of it is floating. If there is anything to worry about here,
that's it.".... My response to you was based on that and my thoughts were
directed to how I might approach evaluating future strains on JRC's cash flow
caused by interest rate fluctuations for the debt you were referencing....I
realize you have more experience in evaluation than I do, so you already
probably do something like "What if the interest rate on that debt shot up
suddenly" calculations....I know in this era of low inflation that that kind of
scenario seems far fetched, however, with rumors of Mr. Greenspan maybe not
getting re-appointed and with Mr. Rubin wanting to leave, and the mounting
inflationary pressures of low unemployment and possibly continually rising oil
prices....I am not comfortable with the notion that "Goldilocks" will last
forever....the inflationary spiral is especially difficult on highly leveraged
companies with a substantial portion of their debt at variable rates....Since
this thread appears to be geared toward investments held for the longer term,
inflation in interest rates, IMO, needs careful thought....you already know
this so my post was probably redundant.

%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 9:33:00 AM
From:jeffbas

Unfortunately, this is relevant:

http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=8552396
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 10:37:00 AM
From:Mike 2.0

All, just read an excellent article in Worth May 99 by Robert X. Cringely re
perfectly legal but very specious accounting tricks in high tech. Must reading
IMO.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 10:38:00 AM
From:Ron Bower

Mike,

"On another note, I see that Anchor Gaming (SLOT) and IGT are falling in
response to pending legislation and decreases in casino builds. I'm preparing
to buy both."

I suggest you look at SHFL. I recently took a small position with intentions of
adding if they perform as I think they will. I like the potential for recurring
lease revenues from their card shufflers that are just now starting to get into
the casinos. This is new business with established casinos and does not rely on
casino growth.

You'll find many posts from disgruntled investors that bought at higher numbers
expecting quick profits from a company that will slowly build a recurring
revenue base.

FWIW,
Ron
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 10:46:00 AM
From:Ron Bower

Jeffrey,

Continued Index strength will further weaken the Small Cap funds. At a certain
point, it might be wise to buy into them?

A Ponzi in the Index companies?

And there's growing companies out there paying 10% dividends on 25% earnings
that are selling under BV, even for cash liquidity.

But - "2/3 of market investors don't know that stock prices are based on
earnings" Wondering if this includes those in the US government that want to
invest SS in the market?

Ron

%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 11:20:00 AM
From:Michael Burry

Actually I don't think "everybody" is. I'm certainly not, and most of the
others here on this particular thread are not. I think most of us are being
critical of the approach. I posted the link because I think someone here asked
for it, not because I believe it.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 11:32:00 AM
From:Michael Burry

That mutual funds will find a crisis in the redemption/selling stock balance is
for me a given.

I frequently tell colleagues that I envision a time in the future when a group
of workers sitting around the water cooler are talking about their mutual
funds. The mood is resignation after panic. The market is crashing, and some
event has finally spooked the American public. Everyone is pulling out of
mutual funds, but the mutual funds can no longer guarantee that the sale will
get done on time. They can't sell stock fast enough. Fred says, "Fidelity will
get me my money by Friday." Arney chimes in, "Lucky you, Vanguard says it'll
take a week."

The same mechanism that has caused small caps to fall flat (and continue
falling flat this year) will cause large caps to fall hard when the time comes.
And mutual fund cos will bankrupt themselves or exist in ignominy thanks to
endless barrages of lawsuits.

I usually finish up my sermon by saying something like "The average shareholder
wasn't spooked at all this past fall, and look what happened. The Dow fell 20%
on mild jitters.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 11:36:00 AM
From:Paul Senior

Jim Clarke: I'll take the other side of many of the points in your last post.
My summary response is: I'm looking for methods that work that are fact-based,
and I don't see that in your post.

Just a few points:

1. "If you don't understand the business, no formula is going to save you".
Some indication to me that diversified buying of large cap, dominant
businesses, selling out of favor (low pe, low psr) is a formulaic method that
works (ref: Dreman, Graham)

2. "Again there is no substitute for hard work". I would like to believe that
someone, or a team of people, who spend 8-12 hours every day looking for stock
bargains and stock profits-- those people would perform better than a "casual"
investor. And I KNOW those pros want to believe that too. After all, it seems
that we are told or maybe we see, that in every (other) endeavor in life, the
harder one works, the more success one achieves. But there's just no proof that
this is so in the stock market. Either on an individual basis or group basis.
(Index funds continue to beat many mutual funds). I believe this is because
success is a function of how well the investment performs, not how much or how
hard the investor works.
My opinion is that intelligent/hard working people who have been successful in
every other thing they've tackled, just assume that they will be "successful"
(by which I mean, have better results than less intelligent, less hard working
people) in the stock market too. I think it's an unproven assumption. There's
no evidence that I see that this is so in general.

3. Regarding "financial skill and experience". Back in '74 Graham wrote (p.
xvi), "Even the majority of the investment funds, with all their experienced
personnel, have not performed so well over the years as has the general
market." Just exactly how much is experience and financial skill correlated to
investment success then? There's no evidence that for the average person,
spending time going over 10-k's in order to make successful investments is a
time or cost-effective activity.

4. "If I've crunched numbers...sat down with management...I can be pretty
confident". Yes, to me, that's the best argument for doing a lot of research
and work-- to give confidence to hang in when things, especially extraneous,
shake one's nerves. But again not necessarily a method or the best method or
only method that works for instilling confidence for the average investor. Or
not for pros too maybe--g-: Even in your own posts here, where you've stated
you've just gone ahead and sold half of your positions, or done all the work on
some stock for your business, but didn't gain any confidence to buy the stock
for yourself.

Well, those are just my opinions.... Paul
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 11:43:00 AM
From:Michael Burry

Wayne,

My understanding is limited. Another poster here I know has spent quite a bit
of time on them and maybe will post more.

But my style is as much contrarian as it is value now. And SLOT and IGT are
very much contrarian, with big price falls, some insider buying at higher
prices (IGT at 20, SLOT at 50).

My understanding of the legislation is that it is getting watered down and may
not pass. Graham has noted that the market overpunishes pending legislation. As
this legislation gets watered down, the stock prices have remained low.

http://www.lasvegassun.com/sunbin/stories/archives/1999/mar/23/508574816.html

There are risks, the most of significant of which are highlighted in this
article, where IGT claims there's no money to be made in just selling slots.
And there's a lot of uncertainty in the biz relationship between IGT and the
casinos.

http://www.lasvegassun.com/sunbin/stories/archives/1999/mar/08/508507725.html

SLOT is diversifying, and I like the longer-term trends in its stock price, the
growth opportunities given its size, and I don't mind its recent acquisition,
which I think fits and already has good cash flow.
SLOT has an underleveraged balance sheet.

My feeling is that IGT and SLOT will survive, and that the smallest players
will be hurt even more, as IGT claims.
And if the legislation either doesn't pass or passes in a milder form, well,
then the stocks should rebound.

I've targeted the low $30's for SLOT, and the $11-12 for IGT but they're on my
"buy real soon" along with MO, LTR, which I like for similar contrary reasons.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 1:22:00 PM
From:Roger L. Chuchen

Mike, the following is what I picked out from the 10-K.

On March 25, 1999, CWG shares were sold in an initial public offering
("IPO") at a price of 3.30 British Pounds per share and listed on the London
Stock Exchange. As a result of the IPO, CNA will receive approximately 100
million shares of CWG stock and approximately $143 million in cash. After
completion of the transaction, CNA will own approximately 15% of the
outstanding stock of CWG. CNA will account for its ownership in CWG as an
available-for-sale security with a carrying value of approximately $535 million
(based upon the IPO price of 3.30 British Pounds).

So, since LTR owns 85% of CNA, doesn't it mean that it is going to receive $576
million or 85% of the $678 million transaction (assuming that CWG remains at
its IPO price)?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 2:06:00 PM
From:Bob Rudd

Jim: Regarding the Altman Bankruptcy Predictor Model, go here for info and
discussion: http://www.siliconinvestor.com/subject.aspx?subjectid=26586
There's lots of discussion and links to research on the subject on that board.
[I just got into it recently while I was dancing with Loewen - went in thinking
I couldn't go wrong buying at 10% of book..I got out with a profit after the
models were all very negative.]
The spreadsheet I use also encompasses a version of Altman specifically
targeted at service companies and 2 other models. Unfortunately, I had a PC
lock-up shortly after running the models so I can't send you a filled-in
version. I'm leaving for Hawaii tomorrow, but when I have time I'll fill the
sheet and email you a copy. One thing that made a difference was the negative
book value, when I first ran it, I neglected to use negative sign and it came
out OK...changed sign and bye bye.
The Yahoo info is a "Heads up", certainly not the last word. I guess the
message is to dig further..get copies of the papers and watch circulation
numbers and ad rates. When Buffet refers to owner earnings, as you're very
aware, he gets there after investments necessary to maintain and grow the
business. It just sounded like this guy was milking these businesses without
regard to maintaining the quality necessary to keep customers loyal.

The net would be a lesser earnings concern nearterm unless, as a result of
shortsighted management, the papers suck so bad they drive a lot of the
customers that way. The bigger net impact would be if the investment community
uses Amazon binoculars to view earnings. With Amazon, investors are using
special binoculars that make earnings that are light years away appear to be
large and close, and similarly make internet impacts on bricks & mortar
businesses that will take a while to develop appear much closer than they
really are. The news delivery business will be profoundly changed by the
net...but real impacts are probably 3 to 5 years out...the technology is there,
but cultural change proceeds more slowly.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 6:02:00 PM
From:Freedom Fighter

Mike,

>>SLOT and IGT<<

I share your philosophy. Thanks! I appreciate your insights.

Wayne
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 6:35:00 PM
From:Allen Furlan

Re: IDTC I am thinking of adding to my position and called Investors Relations
on Thursday but did not receive call back. I received their investors package
about 4 weeks ago and yet the 10Q was for October last year. Investors package
loaded with lots of self promotion, which was interesting but made me wonder if
company is stronger in marketing than in technology. They did include
prospectus from Feb 98 offering but not a prospectus from a secondary. Since
stockholders equity doubled from Feb to Oct and shares increased I concluded a
secondary must have been offered. Do you know if this is so?
But here is what puzzles me.
1) What are the bond covenants that necessitate a buy back. Need bond
prospectus for this. Do you know when bond issue placed and nature of
covenants.
2) Why cant they use cash on hand instead of bridge financing.
3) Is their merit in argument by some on IDTC board that private financing is
more probable than spinoff IPO?

P.S. Did you notice that todays savy(?) investors are willing to pay more for
the shares of the ziff davis spinoff tracking stock(zdz) than for the
equivilent shares in the parent. ZD still owns most of the ZDZ shares (about
85%) yet the market capitalization of zdz consisting of public float and shares
held by the parent exceeds the capitalization of the parent? I guess they no
longer teach arithmetic in school.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 7:35:00 PM
From:James Clarke

Paul, that's good. Really good. I'll chew on that one for a while.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 9:14:00 PM
From:Shane M

Paul,

Your comments remind me of the section in Dreman's book where studies show that
increasing the amount of information increases one's confidence in a decision,
but rarely increase the actual quality of a decision. The end result is that
investors run the risk of becoming convinced that their decision is correct
even though the market is telling them they're wrong (through a falling share
price).

This happened to me with Deswell Industries. I was locked in on a stock like
DSWLF, bet big, and lost. The whole way down I couldn't believe the stock's
price action up until the most recent quarterly report. What I learned: Never
bet too big on one position ever again - or in other words force
diversification upon my portfolio. To a lesser degree it has taught me to limit
my averaging down activity. To be wrong is OK, but to persist in being wrong
again and again by averaging down repeatedly doesn't sit well.

Shane

%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 10:13:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

To be wrong is OK, but to persist in
being wrong again and again by averaging down repeatedly doesn't sit well. 

Averaging down can be both wonderful and deadly. I found a simple rule that
helps me, at least, deal with this (or at least give me confidence that I think
I know how to deal with this ;)). I have the utmost confidence in Deswell
still, by the way.

First I had to decide that I wasn't going to average down more than once in any
stock. And once I decided that, I decided that if I were to average down, it
would have to make a significant difference in my basis, enough to offset the
increased risk signalled by being wrong once. And a 20% drop doesn't do it - my
cost basis is still 90% of original. I've decided on a 33% rule - a stock I
have the utmost confidence in must fall at least 33% before I will even
consider it again. And if I can I'll try to hold off for a 50% drop.

A corollary to this is that I won't buy a stock again at the same price or at a
higher price unless significantly material new information is discovered by me.

These rules have caused by default, but also by design, the number of stocks in
my portfolio to grow and grow.

The days of saying, "wow, this is cheap" "wow,it's still cheap" "wow, it's even
cheaper" "wow, now it is really cheap" and buying at each of those "decision"
points (and thereby concentrating my portfolio by default), are behind me.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/3/1999 11:52:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

Steelcase, a stock on my buy soon list (but not yet bought) got into Barron's
this week. This is a depressed industry. But I see all the reasons I like the
stock listed in the mag. Jim, I thought you liked this stock at one point too.
I also like competitor Hon Industries. Both have strong insider buying.

Barrons also makes note of the negative values being assigned to RJR Nabisco
and Loews' tobacco operations, and notes the negative value on MO's US cig ops.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/4/1999 1:23:00 PM
From:jeffbas

I like your rules. I sort of made a mistake on the second rule with MWY, as I
bought more at my initial entry price of $10 as I became more comfortable with
it and saw MORE insider buying, which is not really "significantly material new
information".

I would add a corollary -- that it is OK to buy more at a higher price on
significantly material new information so long as you do not buy so much as to
raise your average price a lot. Also, you have to watch out to what extent the
new info was an inherent assumption in your original decision. I have made the
mistake of buying more on news which I knew from inside information was coming
when I made the original investment.

Two examples: You buy an oil stock because the price is cheap and you believe
the next move in oil prices will be up. If the next move is up, this was
information you assumed in your original decision. The news justifies SOME (but
not major) further commitment at the same or slightly higher price because the
negative alternatives, to which you assigned a low probability when you made
the investment, have been eliminated.

Second, you buy a technology stock because of a new product development you
know about but the market does not. The actual announcement justifies no
further investment.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/4/1999 2:10:00 PM
From:James Clarke

That was a great piece on Steelcase. I had done a lot of work on the stock
before my firm invested in it a couple months ago, but they dug up stuff I
hadn't found. If you haven't read the piece, read it. This is a fine company,
an industry leader and very cheap. I could see this tripling if management does
what it says it is going to do to bump up return on capital.

JJC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/4/1999 5:25:00 PM
From:cfimx

oh no. that makes three of us. what are we missing here?

seriously: just more proof that many many stocks are in their own "private
idaho." <G>
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 9:03:00 AM
From:Dan Meleney

FLYT: Anyone still in or looking at it?

Price has come back down almost to where I first got in. I got out when market
value got close to cash minus all liabilities. My concern now is that
management is heading in wrong direction and will start burning cash again.

Dan
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 11:30:00 AM
From:Freedom Fighter

Bergen Brunswig

I've been looking at the medical supplies industry. Perhaps it can be viewed as
an alternate entry point into the growing health care business instead of the
drug companies. The demographics etc... should favor them also. Most of the
high quality drug companies are too expensive.

BBC is a distributor. It's trading at about 16x the 99 earnings estimate with
growth projections in the 20% range for the next couple of years. I'm early in
my research but interested enough to bring it up for discussion if anyone has
any insights.

Wayne
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 1:39:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

James Cramer has been kind of enough to provide an example of
what's wrong with this market - himself.

http://fnews.yahoo.com/street/99/04/05/wrong_990405.html

And TSC is going public with this crap?

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 4:33:00 PM
From:geoffrey Wren

Shane: Your observations are well put. Here is a problem I have had, and am
only now getting better at it. It is selling the stock I own when they have a
big run-up in price and I sense the momentum is dying out. Usually when I get
the feeling that the price is too high, I am right. Usually in the past, I have
not sold (having a buy and hold philosophy). Now I am better at selling. I
often have sold 1/2 or 2/3 of my holdings in these circumstances. From now on,
I will force myself to sell all.

I think I have a pretty good sense of when my own stocks are overpriced,
because usually I have been following or owning them for months or years,
whereas stocks I look to buy often I have followed only for weeks. I cannot say
exactly how I have this feeling, but it is like when you are playing poker and
the other player is betting big and you just know he has a hand, but you stay
in the pot, sort of like a frog who is frozen by a flashlight. You feel you
should be out, but you stay in.

Geoff Wren
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 4:46:00 PM
From:Ken Ludwig

Amen to that. I too need to do a better job of working the run-ups. Not doing
so has cost me a bloody fortune in the last 2 years.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 7:15:00 PM
From:18acastra

Applied Power (APW) is a misunderstood/unrecognized value play in the
Electronics Contract Mfg. industry trading at about a 9x P/E on a cash basis
for 25% growth:

APW trades should do about $2.30 of EPS this year and trades at $28, so trading
at only 12x P/E for a company that has been growing earnings at 25% for the
last several years. THere is also about $.65 of Goodwill Ammortization flowing
through P&L, so on a cash basis EPS is really ~$3.00, or a P/E of 9x for 25%
growth. APW also recently announced a giant deal with Ericcson:

http://biz.yahoo.com/bw/990224/wi_applied_1.html

Very compelling. My opinion.

This is a summary from a recent wall street report:

Executive Summary
* We believe APW, a global leader in the fragmented electronics enclosures
industry, is likely to gain share as OEMs consolidate their supply base,
increase integration requirements and divest manufacturing operations.
* We expect continuing strong cash flows from the Company's Tools and Supplies
and Engineered Solutions divisions.
* In our opinion, shares are extremely undervalued and do not reflect the
significant growth likely in the Company's EMS operations.
* We are establishing FY99 and FY2000 EPS estimates of $2.30 and $2.90. We
expect 20% L-T EPS CAGR. We rate APW a Strong Buy with a 6-month price target
of $46, an 84% premium to current prices.Key Data: 1998 1999 2000
52-Week Range: $40-$20 EPS
Market Cap.(MM): $1,007 Q1 $0.43 A $0.53 A $0.70 E
Shares Out.(MM): 40.4 Q2 $0.41 A $0.48 A $0.71 E
Avg Daily Vol.(K): 380 Q3 $0.48 A $0.60 E $0.74 E
Fiscal Year End: 8/31 Q4 $0.53 E $0.69 E $0.75 E
Year $1.85 $2.30 $2.90
P/E 13.5x 10.8x 8.6x
P/E/G 67.4% 54.2% 43.0%
Total value/EBITDA: 6.5 Revenues
Debt/Total Capital: .55 Q1 $275.4 A $435.6 A $528.6 E
Secular Growth Rate: 20% Q2 $279.4 A $422.0 A $540.4 E
Q3 $303.9 A $470.0 E $560.4 E
Q4 $372.0 A $515.0 E $570.6 E
Year $1,230.7 $1,842.6 $2,220.0
Company Description: Applied Power, a diversified manufacturer with
increasingly
profitable operations in Engineered Solutions and Tools and Supplies, has
recently transformed itself into a global leader in the rapidly consolidating,
fast-growing electronics enclosure segment of the Electronics Manufacturing
Services industry.

%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 7:36:00 PM
From:Shane M

Geoff,

I have to disagree here. I find it's best to let my winners run. Granted, I do
tend to invest in more growth oriented companies rather than value stocks, so
perhaps different rules should apply depending on the stock.

Here's my life lesson on letting winners run. Promise not to laugh <g>.

I purchased Knight-Trimark (NITE) on Sept 1 at 7 1/2. At the time I felt it was
worth about $14-$16. On Dec 7 I sold at $16 fairly happy with my trade. Here's
what happened since then.

http://quicken.excite.com/investments/charts/?symbol=NITE

Yes, my boss - who still holds the stock - occassionally reminds me of how
wrong my sell decision was and counts up the lost dollars for me. Not quite a
10 bagger (yet), but almost. This one example is enough to encourage me to let
winners run. These kind of investments can cover up a whole lot of mistakes in
a portfolio. When a stock grows wings I'm going to try my best to let it fly.
And when I take profits on big winners I want to try to leave half on the
table.

Again, this may only apply to growth stocks, but it was a powerful lesson to
me.

Shane
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 8:37:00 PM
From:geoffrey Wren

Shane, I'd agree to a point about letting winners run, when it is gradual over
time. And it's probably best to let winners run, rather than let losers run!
lol. Still, I think when one follows a stock for awhile you develop a feel for
a difference between a sharp movement for a good reason and a sharp movement
for no apparent reason. If you are in a stock before the herd gets to it, that
is good luck. Just be sure to get out of it before the herd leaves. I think a
clue of this condition of the herd arriving is when the bulletin boards get
relatively heavy with posts and the posters are contentious with anyone who
posts a message doubting the valuation of a company.

Geoff Wren
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 10:43:00 PM
From:Walter in HK

Applied Power looks good. Down from 38, with reason
I think, because they bit off big chunks, took on a lot of debt and have to
integrate alien cultures. But they looked well managed in the past.

The question is, did success go the CEO's head ? His past experience does not
seem to include buying and successfully integrating such large chunks.

The Yahoo! Board of the last 2 months (for what it's worth), which I looked at
for a clue on the drop, gives some signs of unrest, possibly greater than there
should be.

BTW Carrol the Treas bought a little stock at 30 - 38, so he must have felt
good at the time.

APW seems worth thinking about some more .....

Walter in HK
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/5/1999 10:55:00 PM
From:Mike 2.0

Allen: Nash Finch follow-up...

Do you still follow NAFC? I see a fair amount of insider buying:
http://biz.yahoo.com/t/n/nafc.html
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/6/1999 2:04:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

Round two of piddly me v. Amazon

FTR, I shorted Amazon at 188.

I shoulda never said never. Last time I shorted at 113, covered 1/3 at 155, and
covered the remaining 2/3 at 104.

My reasoning is it's getting near old highs, it is ridiculously overvalued, and
if it breaks through to even newer highs, I'll cover.
And yes, I'm doing it on principle, too.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/6/1999 2:08:00 PM
From:Mike 2.0

Good luck Mike...FWIW the May 99 issue of Worth has another portfolio manager
naming YHOO as one of this month's 10 Stocks to Avoid, giving Yahoo a fair
value of $15. I remember the last guy who gave Yahoo and Amazon such a
distinction, would have been homeless had he really been short both stocks.

BTW, why sell short vs. buying a deep-out-of-the-money LEAP put?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/6/1999 2:09:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

So Steelcase is doing the typical Barron's roundtrip. I'm planning on picking
some up as it gets near its lows again. Most value investors should read the
article - it's rah-rah, but solid.

Also looking to pick up some Timet (TIE) once again at an unbelievable $6 with
all that insider buying and over $4 in cash.

And Oracle keeps falling. Go go go.

The account I'd buy all this in is still frozen, though.

Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/6/1999 6:04:00 PM
From:Madharry

OT -paul thanks for the heads up on THQI. People in my office are very
concerned about Y2k problems on power systems.- Is there a value play in the
portable electric generator field?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/6/1999 9:30:00 PM
From:James Clarke

All though Mike's ins and outs on AMZN, I've been short the thing on principle
too. I covered today at a big loss at about the same price Mike shorted. Mike,
you sold to me. Only one of us can be happy about that one in two weeks.

No mas.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/6/1999 9:44:00 PM
From:Michael Burry

Only one of us can be happy about that one in two weeks. 

Since I'm now in it and you're not, I'd have to say I'd hope I'll be the happy
one, and you will at least not be sad.

To say that valuation is being ignored is an understatement.
Mike
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:4/6/1999 10:53:00 PM
From:Shane M

Also looking to pick up some Timet (TIE) once again

Mike, That's scary. Hadn't realized it had gone so low. TIMET must be the best
non-buy I ever made. My buy limit never executed somewhere up in the mid-20s so
I cancelled moved on to something else. That would've been ugly cause I'd
probably have held on for most of the ride down.

And Oracle keeps falling. Go go go.

I'm saving alot of cash too for the ERP crash we're seeing. The Y2K spending
freeze is happening and the stock prices are starting to reflect that. My
feeling is they still have farther down to go. Contrarian investing seems to
work well in the techs because the price swings can be so pronounced.

Shane
%EOM----------------------

